sv: Implementeringstyp: Molnbaserad; Hybrid; På plats; Övrigt
ko: 배포 유형: 클라우드 기반; 하이브리드; 온프레미스; 기타
en: Deployment type: Cloud-based; Hybrid; On-premises; Other
zh-TW: 部署類型: 雲端式; 混合; 地端; 其他
tr: Dağıtım türü: Bulut tabanlı; Hibrit; Yerinde; Diğer
pt-BR: Tipo de implantação: Baseado em nuvem; Híbrida; No local; Outro
pt-PT: Tipo de implementação: Baseado em nuvem; Híbrido; No local; Outro
it: Tipo di distribuzione: Basato sul cloud; Ibrido; In sede; Altro
hu: Telepítés típusa: Felhőalapú; Hibrid; Helyszíni; Egyéb
fr: Type de déploiement: Basé sur le cloud; Hybrid; Sur site; Autre
fi: Käyttöönottotapa: Pilvipohjainen; Hybridi; Paikan päällä; Muu
ro-RO: Tip de implementare: În cloud; Hibrid; La fața locului; Altele
sl-SI: Vrsta razmestitve: V oblaku; Hibridno; Lokalno; Drugo
ru: Тип развертывания: Облачный; Гибридные; Локальный; Другой
lt-LT: Diegimo tipas: Debesijos pagrindu; Hibridinė; Vietoje; Kita
es: Tipo de implementación: Basado en la nube; Híbrido; En las instalaciones; Otros
de: Bereitstellungstyp: Cloudbasiert; Hybrid; On-Premises; Sonstiges
nb: Utplasseringstype: Skybasert; Hybrid; På stedet; Annet
el: Τύπος ανάπτυξης: Βασισμένο στο νέφος; Υβριδικό; Επί τόπου; Άλλο
th: ประเภทตะขอพับ: แบบระบบคลาวด์; แบบไฮบริด; แบบติดตั้งภายในสถานที่; อื่นๆ
nl: Implementatietype: Cloudgebaseerd; Hybride; Op locatie; Andere
sk-SK: Typ nasadenia: Cloudový; Hybridný; Na mieste; Iné
zh-CN: 部署类型: 基于云; 混合型; 本地; 其他
ja: デプロイメントの種類: クラウドベース; ハイブリッド; オンプレミス; その他
vi: Loại triển khai: Dựa trên đám mây; Ván kết hợp; Triển khai phần mềm tại chỗ; Khác
cs: Typ nasazení: Cloudové; Hybridní; Místní; Jiné
da: Implementeringstype: Cloud-baseret; Hybrid; Internt; Andet
hr-HR: Vrsta implementacije: U oblaku; Hibridno; Lokalno; Ostalo
bg-BG: Тип на внедряване: Базиран на облак; Хибрид; На място; Други
pl: Typ wdrożenia: Oparty na chmurze; Hybrydowy; Lokalnie; Inne